lt-LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 10188 Y 2
SFX 10188 ogti agia/425 . 301
SFX 10188 ogtis agiasi/425 . 301

SFX 10189 Y 2
SFX 10189 ogti agia/426 . 301
SFX 10189 ogtis agiasi/426 . 301

SFX 10199 Y 1
SFX 10199 ogti agie/427 . 301

SFX 10200 Y 1
SFX 10200 ogtis agie/428 . 301

SFX 10201 Y 2
SFX 10201 ogti ogė/429 . 302
SFX 10201 ogtis ogėsi/429 . 302

SFX 10202 Y 2
SFX 10202 ogti ogė/430 . 302
SFX 10202 ogtis ogėsi/430 . 302

SFX 10203 Y 2
SFX 10203 ogti ogė/431 . 302
SFX 10203 ogtis ogėsi/431 . 302

SFX 10207 Y 2
SFX 10207 tėti tėti/408 . 300
SFX 10207 tėtis tėtis/408 . 300

SFX 10208 Y 2
SFX 10208 tėti tėti/409 . 300
SFX 10208 tėtis tėtis/409 . 300

SFX 10209 Y 2
SFX 10209 tėti tėti/410 . 300
SFX 10209 tėtis tėtis/410 . 300

SFX 10210 Y 2
SFX 10210 tėti tėti/411 . 300
SFX 10210 tėtis tėtis/411 . 300

SFX 10211 Y 2
SFX 10211 tėti tėti/412 . 300
SFX 10211 tėtis tėtis/412 . 300

SFX 10212 Y 2
SFX 10212 tėti tėti/413 . 300
SFX 10212 tėtis tėtis/413 . 300

SFX 10213 Y 2
SFX 10213 tėti tėti/414 . 300
SFX 10213 tėtis tėtis/414 . 300

SFX 10214 Y 2
SFX 10214 tėti tėti/415 . 300
SFX 10214 tėtis tėtis/415 . 300

SFX 10215 Y 2
SFX 10215 tėti tėti/416 . 300
SFX 10215 tėtis tėtis/416 . 300

SFX 10216 Y 2
SFX 10216 tėti tėti/417 . 300
SFX 10216 tėtis tėtis/417 . 300

SFX 10227 Y 2
SFX 10227 tėti čia/418 . 301
SFX 10227 tėtis čiasi/418 . 301

SFX 10228 Y 2
SFX 10228 tėti čia/419 . 301
SFX 10228 tėtis čiasi/419 . 301

SFX 10229 Y 2
SFX 10229 tėti čia/420 . 301
SFX 10229 tėtis čiasi/420 . 301

SFX 10230 Y 2
SFX 10230 tėti čia/421 . 301
SFX 10230 tėtis čiasi/421 . 301

SFX 10231 Y 2
SFX 10231 tėti čia/422 . 301
SFX 10231 tėtis čiasi/422 . 301

SFX 10232 Y 2
SFX 10232 tėti čia/423 . 301
SFX 10232 tėtis čiasi/423 . 301

SFX 10233 Y 2
SFX 10233 tėti čia/424 . 301
SFX 10233 tėtis čiasi/424 . 301

SFX 10234 Y 2
SFX 10234 tėti čia/425 . 301
SFX 10234 tėtis čiasi/425 . 301

SFX 10235 Y 2
SFX 10235 tėti čia/426 . 301
SFX 10235 tėtis čiasi/426 . 301

SFX 10245 Y 1
SFX 10245 tėti tie/427 . 301

SFX 10246 Y 1
SFX 10246 tėtis tie/428 . 301

SFX 10247 Y 2
SFX 10247 tėti tėjo/429 . 302
SFX 10247 tėtis tėjosi/429 . 302

SFX 10248 Y 2
SFX 10248 tėti tėjo/430 . 302
SFX 10248 tėtis tėjosi/430 . 302

SFX 10249 Y 2
SFX 10249 tėti tėjo/431 . 302
SFX 10249 tėtis tėjosi/431 . 302

SFX 10253 Y 2
SFX 10253 uti uti/408 . 300
SFX 10253 utis utis/408 . 300

SFX 10254 Y 2
SFX 10254 uti uti/409 . 300
SFX 10254 utis utis/409 . 300

SFX 10255 Y 2
SFX 10255 uti uti/410 . 300
SFX 10255 utis utis/410 . 300

SFX 10256 Y 2
SFX 10256 uti uti/411 . 300
SFX 10256 utis utis/411 . 300

SFX 10257 Y 2
SFX 10257 uti uti/412 . 300
SFX 10257 utis utis/412 . 300

SFX 10258 Y 2
SFX 10258 uti uti/413 . 300
SFX 10258 utis utis/413 . 300

SFX 10259 Y 2
SFX 10259 uti uti/414 . 300
SFX 10259 utis utis/414 . 300

SFX 10260 Y 2
SFX 10260 uti uti/415 . 300
SFX 10260 utis utis/415 . 300

SFX 10261 Y 2
SFX 10261 uti uti/416 . 300
SFX 10261 utis utis/416 . 300

SFX 10262 Y 2
SFX 10262 uti uti/417 . 300
SFX 10262 utis utis/417 . 300

SFX 10273 Y 2
SFX 10273 uti una/418 . 301
SFX 10273 utis unasi/418 . 301

SFX 10274 Y 2
SFX 10274 uti una/419 . 301
SFX 10274 utis unasi/419 . 301

SFX 10275 Y 2
SFX 10275 uti una/420 . 301
SFX 10275 utis unasi/420 . 301

SFX 10276 Y 2
SFX 10276 uti una/421 . 301
SFX 10276 utis unasi/421 . 301

SFX 10277 Y 2
SFX 10277 uti una/422 . 301
SFX 10277 utis unasi/422 . 301

SFX 10278 Y 2
SFX 10278 uti una/423 . 301
SFX 10278 utis unasi/423 . 301

SFX 10279 Y 2
SFX 10279 uti una/424 . 301
SFX 10279 utis unasi/424 . 301

SFX 10280 Y 2
SFX 10280 uti una/425 . 301
SFX 10280 utis unasi/425 . 301

SFX 10281 Y 2
SFX 10281 uti una/426 . 301
SFX 10281 utis unasi/426 . 301

SFX 10291 Y 1
SFX 10291 uti unie/427 . 301

SFX 10292 Y 1
SFX 10292 utis unie/428 . 301

SFX 10293 Y 2
SFX 10293 uti vė/429 . 302
SFX 10293 utis vėsi/429 . 302

SFX 10294 Y 2
SFX 10294 uti vė/430 . 302
SFX 10294 utis vėsi/430 . 302

SFX 10295 Y 2
SFX 10295 uti vė/431 . 302
SFX 10295 utis vėsi/431 . 302

SFX 10299 Y 2
SFX 10299 ųsti ųsti/408 . 300
SFX 10299 ųstis ųstis/408 . 300

SFX 10300 Y 2
SFX 10300 ųsti ųsti/409 . 300
SFX 10300 ųstis ųstis/409 . 300

SFX 10301 Y 2
SFX 10301 ųsti ųsti/410 . 300
SFX 10301 ųstis ųstis/410 . 300

SFX 10302 Y 2
SFX 10302 ųsti ųsti/411 . 300
SFX 10302 ųstis ųstis/411 . 300

SFX 10303 Y 2
SFX 10303 ųsti ųsti/412 . 300
SFX 10303 ųstis ųstis/412 . 300

SFX 10304 Y 2
SFX 10304 ųsti ųsti/413 . 300
SFX 10304 ųstis ųstis/413 . 300

SFX 10305 Y 2
SFX 10305 ųsti ųsti/414 . 300
SFX 10305 ųstis ųstis/414 . 300

SFX 10306 Y 2
SFX 10306 ųsti ųsti/415 . 300
SFX 10306 ųstis ųstis/415 . 300

SFX 10307 Y 2
SFX 10307 ųsti ųsti/416 . 300
SFX 10307 ųstis ųstis/416 . 300

SFX 10308 Y 2
SFX 10308 ųsti ųsti/417 . 300
SFX 10308 ųstis ųstis/417 . 300

SFX 10319 Y 2
SFX 10319 ųsti undžia/418 . 301
SFX 10319 ųstis undžiasi/418 . 301

SFX 10320 Y 2
SFX 10320 ųsti undžia/419 . 301
SFX 10320 ųstis undžiasi/419 . 301

SFX 10321 Y 2
SFX 10321 ųsti undžia/420 . 301
SFX 10321 ųstis undžiasi/420 . 301

SFX 10322 Y 2
SFX 10322 ųsti undžia/421 . 301
SFX 10322 ųstis undžiasi/421 . 301

SFX 10323 Y 2
SFX 10323 ųsti undžia/422 . 301
SFX 10323 ųstis undžiasi/422 . 301

SFX 10324 Y 2
SFX 10324 ųsti undžia/423 . 301
SFX 10324 ųstis undžiasi/423 . 301

SFX 10325 Y 2
SFX 10325 ųsti undžia/424 . 301
SFX 10325 ųstis undžiasi/424 . 301

SFX 10326 Y 2
SFX 10326 ųsti undžia/425 . 301
SFX 10326 ųstis undžiasi/425 . 301

SFX 10327 Y 2
SFX 10327 ųsti undžia/426 . 301
SFX 10327 ųstis undžiasi/426 . 301

SFX 10337 Y 1
SFX 10337 ųsti undie/427 . 301

SFX 10338 Y 1
SFX 10338 ųstis undie/428 . 301

SFX 10339 Y 2
SFX 10339 ųsti undė/429 . 302
SFX 10339 ųstis undėsi/429 . 302

SFX 10340 Y 2
SFX 10340 ųsti undė/430 . 302
SFX 10340 ųstis undėsi/430 . 302

SFX 10341 Y 2
SFX 10341 ųsti undė/431 . 302
SFX 10341 ųstis undėsi/431 . 302

SFX 10345 Y 2
SFX 10345 ėksti ėksti/408 . 300
SFX 10345 ėkstis ėkstis/408 . 300

SFX 10346 Y 2
SFX 10346 ėksti ėksti/409 . 300
SFX 10346 ėkstis ėkstis/409 . 300

SFX 10347 Y 2
SFX 10347 ėksti ėksti/410 . 300
SFX 10347 ėkstis ėkstis/410 . 300

SFX 10348 Y 2
SFX 10348 ėksti ėksti/411 . 300
SFX 10348 ėkstis ėkstis/411 . 300

SFX 10349 Y 2
SFX 10349 ėksti ėksti/412 . 300
SFX 10349 ėkstis ėkstis/412 . 300

SFX 10350 Y 2
SFX 10350 ėksti ėksti/413 . 300
SFX 10350 ėkstis ėkstis/413 . 300

SFX 10351 Y 2
SFX 10351 ėksti ėksti/414 . 300
SFX 10351 ėkstis ėkstis/414 . 300

SFX 10352 Y 2
SFX 10352 ėksti ėksti/415 . 300
SFX 10352 ėkstis ėkstis/415 . 300

SFX 10353 Y 2
SFX 10353 ėksti ėksti/416 . 300
SFX 10353 ėkstis ėkstis/416 . 300

SFX 10354 Y 2
SFX 10354 ėksti ėksti/417 . 300
SFX 10354 ėkstis ėkstis/417 . 300

SFX 10365 Y 2
SFX 10365 ėksti eskia/418 . 301
SFX 10365 ėkstis eskiasi/418 . 301

SFX 10366 Y 2
SFX 10366 ėksti eskia/419 . 301
SFX 10366 ėkstis eskiasi/419 . 301

SFX 10367 Y 2
SFX 10367 ėksti eskia/420 . 301
SFX 10367 ėkstis eskiasi/420 . 301

SFX 10368 Y 2
SFX 10368 ėksti eskia/421 . 301
SFX 10368 ėkstis eskiasi/421 . 301

SFX 10369 Y 2
SFX 10369 ėksti eskia/422 . 301
SFX 10369 ėkstis eskiasi/422 . 301

SFX 10370 Y 2
SFX 10370 ėksti eskia/423 . 301
SFX 10370 ėkstis eskiasi/423 . 301

SFX 10371 Y 2
SFX 10371 ėksti eskia/424 . 301
SFX 10371 ėkstis eskiasi/424 . 301

SFX 10372 Y 2
SFX 10372 ėksti eskia/425 . 301
SFX 10372 ėkstis eskiasi/425 . 301

SFX 10373 Y 2
SFX 10373 ėksti eskia/426 . 301
SFX 10373 ėkstis eskiasi/426 . 301

SFX 10383 Y 1
SFX 10383 ėksti eskie/427 . 301

SFX 10384 Y 1
SFX 10384 ėkstis eskie/428 . 301

SFX 10385 Y 2
SFX 10385 ėksti ėskė/429 . 302
SFX 10385 ėkstis ėskėsi/429 . 302

SFX 10386 Y 2
SFX 10386 ėksti ėskė/430 . 302
SFX 10386 ėkstis ėskėsi/430 . 302

SFX 10387 Y 2
SFX 10387 ėksti ėskė/431 . 302
SFX 10387 ėkstis ėskėsi/431 . 302

SFX 10391 Y 2
SFX 10391 ėti ėti/408 . 300
SFX 10391 ėtis ėtis/408 . 300

SFX 10392 Y 2
SFX 10392 ėti ėti/409 . 300
SFX 10392 ėtis ėtis/409 . 300

SFX 10393 Y 2
SFX 10393 ėti ėti/410 . 300
SFX 10393 ėtis ėtis/410 . 300

SFX 10394 Y 2
SFX 10394 ėti ėti/411 . 300
SFX 10394 ėtis ėtis/411 . 300

AF 10253,10254,10273,10293,9999 # 106
AF 10299,10300,10319,10339,9999 # 169
AF 10161,10162,10181,10201,9999 # 175
AF 10207,10208,10227,10247,9999 # 202
AF 10391,10392,10411,10414,10459,9999 # 205
AF 10345,10346,10365,10385,9999 # 265
