lt-LT.dic
apauti/106	11
apsiauti/106	13
apsiskųsti/169	13
apskųsti/169	11
apvogti/175	11
atkentėti/202	11
atkosėti/205	11
atsikosėti/205	13
auti/106	11
autis/106	13
besiskųsti/169	13
bevogti/175	11
drėksti/265	11
išdrėksti/265	11
iškentėti/202	11
iškosėti/205	11
išsiauti/106	13
išvogti/175	11
kentėti/202	11
kosėti/205	11
neapauti/106	33
neapsiauti/106	34
neapsiskųsti/169	34
neapsivogti/175	34
neapskųsti/169	33
neapvogti/175	33
neatkentėti/202	33
neatkosėti/205	33
neatsikosėti/205	34
neauti/106	33
nebeapsiauti/106	34
nebeapskųsti/169	33
nebeiškentėti/202	33
nebeišvogti/175	33
nebekentėti/202	33
nebekosėti/205	33
nebenukentėti/202	33
nebenusiauti/106	34
nebepavogti/175	33
nebesiauti/106	34
nebesiskųsti/169	34
nebeskųsti/169	33
nebevogti/175	33
nedrėksti/265	33
neiškentėti/202	33
neiškosėti/205	33
neišvogti/175	33
nekentėti/202	33
nekosėti/205	33
nenuauti/106	33
nenudrėksti/265	33
nenukentėti/202	33
nenukosėti/205	33
nenusiauti/106	34
nenusiskųsti/169	34
nenuvogti/175	33
nepakentėti/202	33
nepasiskųsti/169	34
nepasivogti/175	34
nepaskųsti/169	33
nepavogti/175	33
neperdrėksti/265	33
nepersiauti/106	34
neprasivogti/175	34
neprisikentėti/202	34
neprisivogti/175	34
neprivogti/175	33
nesiauti/106	34
nesiskųsti/169	34
neskųsti/169	33
nesukosėti/205	33
neužsikosėti/205	34
nevogti/175	33
neįdrėksti/265	33
neįskųsti/169	33
nuauti/106	11
nudrėksti/265	11
nukentėti/202	11
nukosėti/205	11
nusiauti/106	13
nusiskųsti/169	13
nuvogti/175	11
pakentėti/202	11
pasiskųsti/169	13
pasivogti/175	13
paskųsti/169	11
pavogti/175	11
perdrėksti/265	11
perkentėti/202	11
persiauti/106	13
pradrėksti/265	11
prasivogti/175	13
prisikentėti/202	13
prisivogti/175	13
privogti/175	11
skųsti/169	11
skųstis/169	13
sukosėti/205	11
teapsiauti/106	13
tebeapvogti/175	11
tebekentėti/202	11
tebekosėti/205	11
tebesiskųsti/169	13
tebevogti/175	11
teiškentėti/202	11
tenesiskųsti/169	13
tenukentėti/202	11
tepakentėti/202	11
tepasiskųsti/169	13
tepavogti/175	11
tevogti/175	11
užsikosėti/205	13
vogti/175	11
įdrėksti/265	11
įskųsti/169	11
